Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4414
Health care professional; immunity.

(1) A health care professional acting or declining to act, in accord with reasonable medical standards, in good faith reliance upon the principal's advance mental health care directive, and, if the principal has an attorney in fact, in reliance upon the decision made by a person whom the health care professional in good faith believes is the attorney in fact acting pursuant to the advance mental health care directive, shall not be subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or discipline for unprofessional conduct for so acting or declining to act.

(2) In the absence of knowledge of the revocation of an advance mental health care directive, a health care professional who acts or declines to act based upon the advance mental health care directive and in accord with reasonable medical standards shall not be subject to criminal prosecution, civil liability, or discipline for unprofessional conduct for so acting or declining to act.

(3) Nothing in the Advance Mental Health Care Directives Act shall limit the liability of an attorney in fact or a health care professional for a negligent act or omission.

Laws 2020, LB247, § 14.